vec_IT/vec_IT.aff
FLAG long
SFX a2 Y 119
SFX a2 0 ave-ƚo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 aƚo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 emo/P2 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 imo/P2 er
SFX a2 0 ion/P2 [^cijɉñ][aei]r
SFX a2 0 iónmeƚo/P8 [^cijɉñ][aei]r
SFX a2 0 on/P2 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 à-ƚo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 àe-ƚo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 àeƚo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 àveƚo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 íe-ƚo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 íeƚo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 íseƚo/I9 [aei]r
SFX a2 0 ónmeƚo/P8 [aei]r
SFX a2 ar e-ƚo/A1 [^i]ar
SFX a2 ar emo/P2 ar
SFX a2 ar endo/P2 ar	ts:gerund_simple
SFX a2 ar ento/P0P2 ar	ts:gerund_simple
SFX a2 ar ènto/P0P2 ar	ts:gerund_simple
SFX a2 ar erave-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar eraƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar eremo/P2 ar
SFX a2 ar erà-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar eràe-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar eràeƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar eràveƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar erémomeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar erémoƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar eríe-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar eríeƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar eríseƚo/I9 ar
SFX a2 ar eve-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar eƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar ion/P2 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a2 ar iónmeƚo/P8 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a2 ar on/P2 ar
SFX a2 ar à/P2 ar
SFX a2 ar àe-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar àeƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar àmeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar àndomeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar àndoƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar àntomeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar àntoƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar àrmeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar è-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar èmeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar èƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar é-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar ée-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar éeƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar émomeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar émoƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar éndomeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar éndoƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar éntomeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar éntoƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 ar éveƚo/A1 ar
SFX a2 ar ónmeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a2 e meƚo/P8 oe
SFX a2 e ƚo/P8 oe
SFX a2 er arave-ƚo/A1 er
SFX a2 er araƚo/A1 er
SFX a2 er aremo/P2 er
SFX a2 er aron/P2 er
SFX a2 er arà-ƚo/A1 er
SFX a2 er aràe-ƚo/A1 er
SFX a2 er aràeƚo/A1 er
SFX a2 er aràveƚo/A1 er
SFX a2 er arémomeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er arémoƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er aríe-ƚo/A1 er
SFX a2 er aríeƚo/A1 er
SFX a2 er aríseƚo/I9 er
SFX a2 er arónmeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er imo/P2 er
SFX a2 er ion/P2 [^cijɉñ]er
SFX a2 er iónmeƚo/P8 [^cijɉñ]er
SFX a2 er iƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er on/P2 er
SFX a2 er àndomeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er àndoƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er àntomeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er àntoƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er é-ƚo/A1 er
SFX a2 er émeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er émomeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er émoƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er éndomeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er éndoƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er éntomeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er éntoƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er érmeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er éveƚo/A1 er
SFX a2 er ímeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 er ónmeƚo/P8 er
SFX a2 iar e-ƚo/A1 iar
SFX a2 ier e-ƚo/A1 ier
SFX a2 io i/P2 io
SFX a2 ioe eƚo/A1 ioe
SFX a2 ir e-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX a2 ir ímeƚo/P8 ir
SFX a2 ir írmeƚo/P8 ir
SFX a2 ir íveƚo/A1 ir
SFX a2 o a/P2 o
SFX a2 o e/P2 o
SFX a2 o i/P2 [^i]o
SFX a2 oe ameƚo/P8 oe
SFX a2 oe aƚo/P8 oe
SFX a2 oe emeƚo/P8 oe
SFX a2 oe eƚo/P8 oe
SFX a2 oe imeƚo/P8 oe
SFX a2 oe iƚo/P8 oe
SFX a2 r -ƚo/A1 [^i]er
SFX a2 r ndo/P2 [aei]r
SFX a2 r nto/P2 [aei]r
SFX a2 r ve-ƚo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a2 r ƚo/A1 er
