vec_IT/vec_IT.dic
alterixar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
apóstrofoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:apostrofar
atito/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:atitar
bagaɉo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:bagaɉar
inbalsar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
xbarbàtoƚoe/a0a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:xbarbatoƚar
batucar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
xberlar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
biaxmo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:biaxmar
bítoe/a0a1a2I1*0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:bitar
bóƚoe/a0a2I1+0-1*0.0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:boƚar
inboskàɉoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:inboskaɉar
brasoƚar/a0a2P0P2+0*0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
bròjoe/a0a1a2I1+0-1*0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:brojar
inbujo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:inbujar
scato/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:scatar
cucotar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
indevenar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
radolsir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
xafrànoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:xfranar
xoƚar/a0a2P0P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
entuxiàxmoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:entuxiaxmar
sodisfo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:sodisfar
farnètiko/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:farnetikar
paxífegoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:paxifegar
konfarmo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0-1	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:konfarmar
infigo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:infigar
refisiar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
konfortar/a0a1a2P0P1P2-1V0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
fràpoƚoe/a0a2I1+0*0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:frapoƚar
frodar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
furbir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
ingamèƚo/a0a2P0P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:ingameƚar
ingateo/a0a1a2P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:ingatear
goèrno/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:goernar
graɉòtoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:graɉotar
ingreɉar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
grostinar/a0a1a2P0P1P2*0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
guídoe/a0a1a2I1+0-1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:guidar
inpaxo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:inpaxar
jéskoƚoe/a0a2I1Ṿè	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:jeskoƚar
dexɉemo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:dexɉemar
kàjoe/a0a1a2I1+0-1*0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:kajar
kanàɉoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:kanaɉar
kapejo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:kapejar
skaròño/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0-0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:skaroñar
inkàtigo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:inkatigar
kíɉoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:kiɉar
perkoƚar/a0a2P0P2Ṿŧ	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
konpànegoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:konpanegar
skorajir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2-0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
kosto/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0-1	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:kostar
kroo/a0a1a2P0P1P2I0*0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:kroar
intrakuerir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
rekúparo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:rekuparar
ƚaóroe/a0a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:ƚaorar
ƚemóxino/a0a2P0P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:ƚemoxinar
ƚinbèƚo/a0a2P0P2I0Ṿè	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:ƚinbeƚar
ƚordar/a0a2P0P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
magónoe/a0a1a2I1+0*0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:magonar
maneto/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0+0*0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:manetar
marɉar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
màxaroe/a0a1a2I1+0*0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:maxarar
meraveɉo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0*0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:meraveɉar
armiƚio/a0a2P0P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:armiƚiar
xmortiprikar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
móvoe/a0a1a2I1*0.0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:móver
múxoƚo/a0a2P0P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:muxoƚar
arníbioe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:arnibiar
núvoƚo/a0a2P0P2I0+0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:nuvoƚar
oƚàndoe/a0a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:oƚandar
inorkar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
padronixo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:padronixar
inpaƚudar/a0a2P0P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
sparento/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:sparentar
paturnio/a0a1a2P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:paturniar
inpéjoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:inpejar
peñoro/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:peñorar
pestixo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:pestixar
pianxòtoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:pianxotar
píngoƚoe/a0a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:pingoƚar
píxoƚoe/a0a2I1+0*0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:pixoƚar
pólxoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:polxar
sponxar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
prèmioe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:premiar
sproporsionar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
skorabio/a0a1a2P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:skorabiar
rantar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
rejòto/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0Ṿŧ	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:rejotar
rodar/a0a1a2P0P1P2r0-0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
rostir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2+0r5V0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
ruvinar/a0a1a2P0P1P2-0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
sàlvoe/a0a1a2I1.0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:salvar
scopasar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inseminir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
sfisiar/a0a1a2P0P1P2r5	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
màlsipoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:malsipar
skarpinar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
skrevasar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
soƚéjoe/a0a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:soƚejar
sostantivo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:sostantivar
spérito/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0+0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:speritar
spríngoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:springar
staño/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0-0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:stañar
stómego/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:stomegar
stropo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0-0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:stropar
sufràjoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:sufrajar
takíxoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:takixar
tartajo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:tartajar
sorinténdoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:sorinténder
tèño/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0.0-0@0:0^1	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:tèñer
tínpano/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:tinpanar
tórboƚoe/a0a2I1+0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:torboƚar
tragar/a0a1a2P0P1P2r5	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
trido/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0*0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:tridar
túfoe/a0a1a2I1+0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:tufar
skonsetar/a0a1a2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
siviƚixo/a0a2P0P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:siviƚixar
unifórmoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:uniformar
vendémoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:vendemar
viàɉoe/a0a1a2I1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:viaɉar
vovo/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:vovar
